Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 18

Investment and Security Powers

45-2-1801. Legislative intent.

It is the intention of the general assembly both to broaden the permissible activities available to state chartered banks and to ensure the soundness of the state's banking system by protecting depositors.

It is further the intention of the general assembly to provide for the sound conduct of the business of banks while authorizing the availability of expanded services under the authority of the appropriate state regulatory entities.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-2-1802. Powers generally.

An authorized state bank, directly or indirectly through a subsidiary, may:

Provide portfolio investment advice to customers;

Serve as investment advisor to investment companies, including, but not limited to, open-end and closed-end mutual funds, private investment companies and investment companies registered under the Investment Companies Act of 1940;

Serve as investment or financial advisor to states, counties and municipalities or subdivisions or instrumentalities thereof;

Act as general partner to investment partnerships;

Act as dealer-manager or financial advisor to corporations or partnerships, including, but not limited to, providing valuation advice, opinions with respect to sales or purchases or assets, corporate restructuring, issuances of securities, mergers and other acquisitions;

Engage in the sale, distribution, and underwriting of, and deal in, commercial paper issued by any entity;

Engage in the sale, distribution, and underwriting of, and deal in, promissory notes secured by real estate mortgages, credit obligations secured by real or personal property or manufactured housing, participation interests in promissory notes and credit obligations, and mortgage related payment bonds secured by promissory notes; and

Engage in the sale, distribution and underwriting of, and deal in, stocks, bonds, debentures, notes, mutual fund shares or unit investment trust interest, and other securities which may be sold by a broker-dealer, financial institution or investment company under Tennessee law.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

45-2-1803. Regulations — Adoption — Office of subsidiaries.

The commissioner of financial institutions shall adopt regulations, for the protection of depositors, that state banks, or any class of state banks determined by the commissioner to be appropriate, are required to apply to and receive approval of the commissioner before engaging in one (1) or more of the activities permitted in § 45-2-1802, and may be required to conduct certain of the activities, other than those activities that may be conducted directly by a national bank, only through a subsidiary.

Any offices of the subsidiary shall not be considered branches of the bank for purposes of § 45-2-614.

In addition, the commissioner of commerce and insurance may adopt regulations, if the commissioner determines that the action is necessary for the protection of investors and in the public interest, to require the underwriting, market making or dealing in securities (other than securities which may be underwritten or dealt in by national banks or in which national banks may make a market) activities of state banks be conducted through a subsidiary.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

45-2-1804. Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner of financial institutions, in adopting regulations pursuant to §45-2-1803, shall:

Determine the appropriate level of capital or assets required for a bank to engage directly in an activity permitted in § 45-2-1802;

Determine whether the risk to depositors is sufficiently significant as to require that the activity permitted in § 45-2-1802 must be conducted in a separately capitalized subsidiary;

Determine the appropriate minimum level of capital required for the subsidiary;

Condition the bank's or subsidiary's engaging in an activity permitted in § 45-2-1802, upon a specified level of demonstrated expertise or training;

In connection with subsidiaries engaged in the activities specified in § 45-2-1802(6)-(8), adopt regulations restricting transactions between the subsidiary and a state bank parent or affiliate of the subsidiary to those transactions which are permissible under and consistent with the federal deposit insurance corporation regulations; the regulations may be adopted by reference; and.

Adopt other regulations that are necessary to provide adequate protection for depositors of the state bank, giving due consideration to the limitations, or lack of limitations, on the same or similar activities conducted by other financial institutions.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

45-2-1805. Lending limits.

The lending limit provisions of § 45-2-1102 shall apply to extensions of credit by a state bank to any subsidiary engaging in one (1) or more of the activities permitted in § 45-2-1802, and the sale and purchase of classified loans or loan participations restrictions of § 45-2-1102 shall apply to sales or purchases of classified loans from a state bank to any subsidiary engaged in one (1) or more of the activities permitted in § 45-2-1802.

The amount of any outstanding underwriting commitment or obligation of a state bank or its subsidiary with respect to any single issuer shall not exceed:

The total of the combined lending limits, state and federal, of the state bank and all other banks that are controlled by the same holding company as the state bank; less

The total of all outstanding extensions of credit to the issuer from the state bank and from all other banks that are controlled by the same bank holding company as the state bank; provided, that:

The distribution of open-end mutual funds shall not be considered underwriting; and

An obligation authorized by § 45-2-607 that is held as an investment by a state bank shall not be considered an extension of credit by the bank.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

45-2-1806. Investment advisors — Registration.

Any state bank or state bank subsidiary that acts as an investment advisor to any mutual fund shall register as an investment advisor with the United States securities and exchange commission and with the department of commerce and insurance. For purposes of this section, a bank common trust fund, investment in which is limited to accounts in which the bank acts as fiduciary or co-fiduciary, shall not be considered a mutual fund.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

Law Reviews.

SEC Injunctions, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (2001).

45-2-1807. Uninsured depository accounts.

Any depository account with a state bank or state bank subsidiary upon which drafts, checks, or other negotiable instruments can be drawn and that is not insured or partially insured by a corporation or subdivision of the United States government must in the application for the account inform the customer of the lack of deposit insurance, and the customer must acknowledge by signature and date of the same.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.

45-2-1808. Insured and noninsured deposits and investments — Disclosures to customers.

Any state bank, or securities broker-dealer that offers both insured deposit accounts, including, but not limited to, insured management accounts or insured certificates of deposit, and noninsured investments shall in any advertisement, brochure, prospectus or other advertising statement and in documents opening a customer account provide the disclosures provided in subsection (b).

The disclosure required in subsection (a) shall, with regard to the account or investment offering, indicate:

In the case of a noninsured investment, the fact that the investment is not insured; and

In the case of an insured deposit account or insured certificate of deposit, the fact that the deposit is insured. In addition, prior to the acceptance of a deposit or sale of a certificate of deposit, the bank or securities broker-dealer shall disclose the name of the insured institution where the deposit is or will be located if other than the institution accepting or selling the deposit.

Compliance with the disclosure requirements of the federal deposit insurance corporation under 12 C.F.R. 337.4 (repealed) or 12 C.F.R. 328.0 et seq., applicable to the investments, insured deposits, or institutions, shall be deemed to comply with this section. This section shall not entitle any bank or securities broker-dealer to advertise that the institution is a federally insured institution in violation of applicable federal rules.

Acts 1989, ch. 168, § 1.